Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1652
Attorney General or county attorney; enforce act.

The Attorney General or the county attorney of any county in which a private postsecondary career school or an agent thereof is found, at the request of the board or on his or her own motion, may bring any appropriate action or proceeding in any court of competent jurisdiction for the enforcement of the Private Postsecondary Career School Act.

Laws 1977, LB 486, § 57;

Laws 1990, LB 488, § 51;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2857;

Laws 1995, LB 4, § 52.